tests/etmek.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] forms of etmek":
    et<v><tv><aor><p3><sg> : eder
    et<v><tv><aor><p1><sg> : ederim
    et<v><tv><ifi><p1><sg> : ettim
    et<v><tv><pass><cont><p3><sg> : ediliyor
